Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.120

Revenue estimates.

Each agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare estimated revenues and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing biennium and shall submit the estimates to the director of financial management and the director of revenue at times and in the form specified by the directors, along with any other information which the directors may request. For those agencies required to develop six-year programs and financial plans under *RCW 44.40.070, six-year revenue estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management and the transportation committees of the senate and the house of representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these revenue estimates is assumed elsewhere.

A copy of such revenue estimates shall be simultaneously submitted to the economic and revenue forecast work group when required by the office of the economic and revenue forecast council.

[ 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 13; 1991 c 358 s 3; 1987 c 502 s 6; 1984 c 138 s 10; 1981 c 270 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 100 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.120. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 44.40.070 was repealed by 2005 c 319 s 141.

Effective date—1991 c 358: See note following RCW 43.88.030.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.